Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-562
Self-insurer; qualifications.

Any person in whose name more than twenty-five motor vehicles are registered may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department, as provided in section 60-563.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 62, p. 503.